evenkiCurMorph/evenki.foma
### evenki.foma ###
# Cons
define Cons [b|ch|d|d'|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n'|ng|p|r|s|s'|sh|t|w|z|zh];
# Vowel
define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|y];
# voiceless consonants
define ConsVoiceless [h|k|p|s|t|ch];
# voiced consonants
define ConsVoiced [d|d'|l|w|g|r|n];
# velar stops
define ConsVelarStop [g|k];
#nasal consonants
define ConsNasal [m|n|ng];

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

#TODO rules for suffixes not sounds!
############################################GENERAL RULES##################################################

# Voiced2Voiceless voiced consonants become voiceless after voiceless consonants (amut/amutpa)
define Voiced2VoicelessReplacement d -> t || ConsVoiceless"^" _   ,,
			       d' -> ch || ConsVoiceless"^" _    ,,
			       w -> p || ConsVoiceless"^" _    ,,
			       g -> k || ConsVoiceless"^" _    ,,
			       r -> t || ConsVoiceless"^" _ ;

# Nasalization w, g, s become nasal after nasals (nginakin/nginakinma)
define Nasalization w -> m || ConsNasal"^" _  ,,
	               g -> ng || ConsNasal"^" _  ,,
	               s -> n || ConsNasal"^" _  ;

#R2L Replacement r becomes l after l (d'ewul-+-re/d'ewulle)
define R2LReplacement r->l || l"^"_ ;

#R2J Replacement r becomes j after j (uj-+-re/ujje)
define R2JReplacement r->j|| j"^"_ ;

#W2P Replacement w becomes p before voiceless consonants (suruw-+-kel/surupkel)
define W2PReplacement w -> p || _"^"ConsVoiceless;

#W2B Replacement w becomes b before voiced consonants (suruw-+-d'ew/surubd'ew)
define W2BReplacement w -> b || _"^"ConsVoiced;

#W2B Replacement w becomes m before nasal consonants (d'ew-+-mi/d'emmi)
define W2MReplacement w -> m || _"^"ConsNasal;

#G2K Replacement g becomes k before voiceless consonants (dag-+-kal/dakkal)
define G2KReplacement g -> k || _"^"ConsVoiceless;

#VelStop2W Replacement g and k become w before w (gag-+-wa/gawwa)
define VelStop2WReplacement ConsVelarStop -> w || _"^"w;

# NgW2MM substitution ng+w transformed into mm (hunad'ing-+-war/hunad'immar)
define NgW2MMSubstitution ng"^"w -> mm;

# R deletion r deleted after n and r (gun-+-re/gune)
define RDeletion r->0 || [n|r]"^"_;

######################################################################AFFIX RULES##############
# T2DiReplacement t replaced with d'i after l/n (gagil/gagild'i)
define AffixT2DiReplacement t -> d'i || ["^"l|n]"^" _ [.#.|"^"];

# J deleted ja replaced with a after l/n (oror/ororo)
define AffixJDeletion j -> 0 || ["^"l|n]"^" _ ;

# NL2R substitution n+l transformed into r (nginakin/nginakir)
define AffixNL2RSubstitution n"^"l -> r;

# I insertion i added after consonants before pl (adyl/adylil) , instr (gag/gagit), ps1sg
#TODO: pl instead of l
define AffixIInsertion [..] -> i || [Cons|n] _ "^" [l|t|g l a|g l i|l d u|w|s|n|t] [.#.|"^"] ,,
				  [..] -> i || [Cons|n] "^" t _ k i;

# DU insertion du added after consonants before locall/prol (adyl/adyldula)
#TODO: locall/prol instead of l
define AffixDUInsertion [..] -> d u || ConsVoiced _ "^"l[A|I][.#.|"^"] ,,
				   [..] -> t u || ConsVoiceless _ "^"l[A|I][.#.|"^"];



read lexc E:\Evenki\thesis\evenkiCurMorph\evenki.lexc
define Lexicon;

define Grammar Lexicon           .o. 
             AffixT2DiReplacement  .o.
			 AffixJDeletion  .o.
			 AffixDUInsertion           .o.
			 AffixNL2RSubstitution           .o.
		     AffixIInsertion           .o.
	         R2JReplacement           .o.
	         R2LReplacement           .o.
	         W2PReplacement           .o.
             W2BReplacement           .o.
             W2MReplacement           .o.
	         VelStop2WReplacement           .o.
             NgW2MMSubstitution           .o.
             RDeletion		.o.		 
			 G2KReplacement           .o.
			 Nasalization           .o.	
			 Voiced2VoicelessReplacement           .o.
             Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
